West Virginia, session 2025, SB439.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: Article 6A. Pollution Control Facilities Tax Treatment. §11-6A-5a. Wind power projects. [Repealed.] Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home